Arkansas, session 2025, SB624.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-18-202(g), concerning the interpretation
of the law concerning student attendance requirements, is amended to read as
follows:
(g) This section shall not be construed to restrict a student's
ability to:
(1) Participate in a tuition agreement with a nonresident school
district for any tuition or fees that also apply to students assigned to the
school district;
(2) Officially transfer to another a nonresident school district
or another public school within a resident or nonresident school district
pursuant to the Public School Choice Act of 2015, § 6-18-1901 et seq.; or
*TNL416*
04/03/2025 2:20:43 PM TNL416

SB624
(3) Attend school as an international exchange student placed
with a host family by an international student exchange visitor placement
organization under the International Student Exchange Visitor Placement
Organization Registration Act, § 6-18-1701 et seq.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-18-227(b)(1), concerning the transfer of
a student to another school district or public school under the Arkansas
Opportunity Public School Choice Act, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) Upon the request of a parent, guardian, or student, if the
student is eighteen (18) years of age or older, a student may transfer from
his or her resident district or public school to another a nonresident school
district or another public school within his or her resident school district
under this section if, at the time of the request under this subdivision
(b)(1):
(A) Either:
(i) The resident public school district has been
classified by the state board as a public school district in need of Level 5
— Intensive support under § 6-15-2913 or § 6-15-2915; or
(ii) The resident public school in which the student
is enrolled has a rating of “F” under §§ 6-15-2105 and 6-15-2106 and state
board rules, as allowed in subdivision (b)(3)(B)(i)(b) of this section; and
or
(iii) The parent, legal guardian, or student if the
student is eighteen (18) years of age or older believes it is in the best
interest of the student to transfer to a nonresident school district or
another public school within his or her resident school district; and
(B) Except as provided in subsection (n) of this section,
the parent, guardian, or student, if the student is eighteen (18) years of
age or older, has notified both the resident and nonresident school districts
of the request for a transfer no earlier than January 1 and no later than May
1 of the school year before the school year in which the student intends to
transfer.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-18-227(b)(2)(A), concerning the effective
date of a transfer under the Arkansas Opportunity Public School Choice Act,
is amended to read as follows:
04/03/2025 2:20:43 PM TNL416

SB624
(2)(A)(i) For the purposes of continuity of educational choice,
a transfer under this section shall operate as an irrevocable election for
each subsequent entire school year and shall remain in force until the
student completes high school or the parent, guardian, or student, if the
student is eighteen (18) years of age or older, timely makes application
under a provision of law governing attendance in or transfer to another
public school within the student's resident school district or a nonresident
school district other than the student's assigned school or resident
district.
(ii)(a) Except as provided in subsection (n) of this
section, a transfer under this section is effective at the beginning of the
next academic year.
(b) A transfer of a student eligible under
subsection (n) of this section is effective immediately upon the nonresident
district's written notification of an acceptance from the nonresident
district or other public school within the student's resident school
district.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-18-227(d)(2)(A)(ii), concerning a lack of
capacity claimed by a school district under the Arkansas Opportunity Public
School Choice Act, is amended to read as follows:
(ii) A lack of capacity may be claimed by a school
district only if:
(a)(1) The school district nonresident school
has reached the maximum student-to-teacher ratio allowed under federal law,
state law, the rules for standards for accreditation Rules Governing the
Standards for Accreditation for Arkansas Public Schools and School Districts,
state rules, or other applicable federal regulations.
(2) A school district may claim a lack
of capacity if, on the date the application for opportunity school choice
option is made under this section, ninety-five percent (95%) or more of the
seats at the grade level in which the student would be assigned at the
nonresident school are filled; and
(b) The claim is consistent with state and
federal law.

04/03/2025 2:20:43 PM TNL416

SB624
SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 6-18-227(g), concerning credits towards
graduation for transferring students under the Arkansas Opportunity Public
School Choice Act, is amended to read as follows:
(g)(1) A receiving district or a public school within a student's
resident school district that accepts a transferring student shall accept
credits toward graduation that were awarded by another district.
(2) The receiving district or public school within a student's
resident school district that accepts a transferring student shall award a
diploma to a nonresident student who transfers to the receiving school
district or public school within the student's resident school district if
the student meets the receiving district's or public school's graduation
requirements.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-18-227(i), concerning requirements for
students transferring under the Arkansas Opportunity Public School Choice
Act, is amended to read as follows:
(i)(1) Unless excused by the receiving school district for illness or
other good cause:
(A) Any student participating in the opportunity public
school choice option shall:
(i) Remain in attendance throughout the school year;
and
(ii) Comply fully with the school's code of conduct;
and
(B) The parent or guardian of each student participating
in the opportunity public school choice option shall comply fully with the
receiving public school's or school district's parental involvement
requirements.
(2) A participant who fails to comply with this section shall
forfeit the opportunity public school choice option.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 6-18-1901(b)(3), concerning legislative
findings under the Public School Choice Act of 2015, is amended to read as
follows:
(3) These benefits of enhanced quality and effectiveness in our
public schools justify permitting a student to apply for admission to a
04/03/2025 2:20:43 PM TNL416

SB624
school in any school resident or nonresident district beyond the school
district in which the student resides, provided that the transfer by the
student does not conflict with an enforceable judicial decree or court order
remedying the effects of past racial segregation in the resident school
district or nonresident school district.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 6-18-1903 is amended to read as follows:
6-18-1903. Public school choice program established.
(a) A public school choice program is established to enable a student
in kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) to attend a school in a
nonresident district or another public school within a resident district,
subject to the limitations under § 6-18-1906.
(b)(1) Each school district shall participate in a public school
choice program that allows students to attend any resident school or
nonresident district, consistent with this subchapter.
(2) Each school district shall:
(A) Establish a policy that allows an enrolled student to
transfer to another public school within a student's resident or nonresident
district; and
(B) Publicly post the policies and procedures for a
student to apply for a transfer as permitted under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of
this section.
(c)(1) A school district shall not deny a student the ability to
attend a school in the student's school district of choice under this section
unless there is a lack of capacity at the school in the student's school
district of choice.
(2) A lack of capacity may be claimed by a school district only
if:
(A)(i) The school district nonresident school has reached
the maximum student-to-teacher ratio allowed under federal law, state law,
the rules for standards for accreditation Rules Governing the Standards for
Accreditation for Arkansas Public Schools and School Districts, state rules,
or other applicable federal regulations.
(ii) A school district may claim a lack of capacity
if, on the date the application for public school choice is made under this
subchapter, ninety-five percent (95%) or more of the seats at the grade level
04/03/2025 2:20:43 PM TNL416

SB624
in which the student would be assigned at the nonresident school are filled;
and
(B) The claim is consistent with state and federal law.
(3) A school district receiving transfers under this section
shall not discriminate on the basis of gender, national origin, race,
ethnicity, religion, or disability, or residential address.
(d)(1) The board of directors of a public school district shall adopt
by resolution specific standards for acceptance and rejection of applications
under this subchapter.
(2) The standards:
(A) May include without limitation the capacity of a
program, class, grade level, or school building;
(B) May include a claim of a lack of capacity by a school
district only if the school district has reached at least ninety percent
(90%) of the maximum authorized student population in a program, class, grade
level, or school building;
(C) Shall include a statement that priority will be given
to an applicant who has a sibling or stepsibling who:
(i) Resides in the same household; and
(ii) Is already enrolled in the nonresident district
or other public school within the resident district by choice; and
(D)(B) Shall not include an applicant's:
(i) Academic achievement;
(ii) Athletic or other extracurricular ability;
(iii) English proficiency level; or
(iv) Previous disciplinary proceedings, except that
an expulsion from another district may be included under § 6-18-510.
(3) A school district or another public school within a school
district receiving transfers under this subchapter shall not discriminate on
the basis of gender, national origin, race, ethnicity, religion, or
disability.
(e) A nonresident district or another public school within a resident
district shall:
(1) Accept credits toward graduation that were awarded by
another district or other public school within a resident district; and
(2) Award a diploma to a nonresident student who transfers under
04/03/2025 2:20:43 PM TNL416

SB624
this subchapter if the student meets the nonresident district's or public
school's graduation requirements.
(f) The superintendent of a school district shall cause public
announcements to be made over the broadcast media and either in the print
media or on the internet to inform parents of students in adjoining districts
and within the school district of the:
(1) Availability of the public school choice program;
(2) Application deadline; and
(3) Requirements and procedure for nonresident students to
participate in the public school choice program.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 6-18-1904 is amended to read as follows:
6-18-1904. General provisions — Definitions.
(a) The transfer of a student under the Arkansas Public School Choice
Act of 1989, § 6-18-206 [repealed], or the Public School Choice Act of 2015,
§ 6-18-1901 et seq., is not voided by this subchapter and shall be treated as
a transfer under this subchapter.
(b)(1) A student may accept only one (1) school choice transfer per
school year.
(2)(A) A student who accepts a public school choice transfer may
return to his or her resident district or the public school within his or her
resident district from which he or she transferred during the school year.
(B) If a transfer student returns to his or her resident
district or the public school within his or her resident district from which
he or she transferred or enrolls in a private or home school, the student's
transfer is voided, and the student shall reapply if the student seeks a
future school choice transfer.
(c)(1) A transfer student attending a nonresident school or another
public school within the student's resident district under this subchapter
may complete all remaining school years at the nonresident district.
(2) A present or future sibling of a student who continues
enrollment in the nonresident district or another public school within his or
her resident district under this subsection and applies for a school choice
transfer under § 6-18-1905 may enroll in the nonresident district or the
other public school within his or her resident district if the nonresident
district or the public school has the capacity to accept the sibling without
04/03/2025 2:20:43 PM TNL416

SB624
adding teachers, staff, or classrooms or exceeding the regulations, rules, or
standards established by law.
(3) A present or future sibling of a student who continues
enrollment in the nonresident district or another public school within his or
her resident district and who enrolls in the nonresident district or the
other public school within his or her resident district under subdivision
(c)(2) of this section may complete all remaining school years at the
nonresident district or the other public school within his or her resident
district.
(d)(1) The transfer student or the transfer student's parent is
responsible for the transportation of the transfer student to and from the
school in the nonresident district where the transfer student is enrolled.
(2) The If a student transfers to a nonresident district under
this subchapter, the nonresident district may enter into a written agreement
with the student, the student's parent, or the transfer student's resident
district to provide the transportation.
(e) For purposes of determining a school district's state aid, a
transfer student is counted as a part of the average daily membership of the
nonresident district where the transfer student is enrolled if the student
transfers to a nonresident district under this subchapter.
(f)(1) A student who transfers to another public school within his or
her resident district or a nonresident district under this subchapter shall
not be:
(A) Denied participation in an extracurricular activity at
the public school within his or her resident district or nonresident district
to which he or she transfers based exclusively on his or her decision to
transfer to the public school or nonresident district; or
(B) Disciplined in any manner based exclusively on the
exercise of his or her right to transfer to another public school within his
or her resident district or a nonresident district under this subchapter.
(2)(A) However, a student who transfers to another public school
or a nonresident school district under this subchapter shall complete a
Changing Schools/Athletic Participation form as defined by the Arkansas
Activities Association.
(B) A Changing Schools/Athletic Participation form shall
be completed and filed with the:
04/03/2025 2:20:43 PM TNL416

SB624
(i) Public school within his or her resident
district or nonresident school district to which the student transfers under
this section; and
(ii) Arkansas Activities Association.
(C)(i) Before a student is eligible to participate in an
extracurricular activity at the public school within his or her resident
district or nonresident school district to which he or she transfers, the
Changing Schools/Athletic Participation form submitted by the student as
required under subdivision (f)(2)(B) of this section shall be signed by the:
(a) Superintendent of the student's resident
school district;
(b) Superintendent of the nonresident school
district to which the student transfers if the student transfers to a
nonresident district under this subchapter; and
(c) Parent, legal guardian, or person standing
in loco parentis to the student.
(ii) The superintendent of a student's resident
school district and the superintendent of the nonresident school district to
which a student transfers, or the superintendent of the student's resident
district if the student is transferring to another public school within his
or her resident district, shall sign the Changing Schools/Athletic
Participation form unless there is demonstrable evidence:
(a) Of recruiting by the receiving school
district or public school personnel; or
(b) The student is transferring to the public
school within his or her resident district or the nonresident school district
solely for athletic purposes.
(D) A Changing Schools/Athletic Participation form shall
be used only for eligibility determination of a student who transfers to
another public school within his or her resident district or nonresident
school district under this subchapter and is enrolled in the receiving school
district or by July 1 before the student enters grades seven through twelve
(7-12).
(E)(i) Public school district personnel and registered
volunteers, as defined by the Arkansas Registered Volunteers Program Act, §
6-22-101 et seq., shall not recruit students to the public school at which
04/03/2025 2:20:43 PM TNL416

SB624
they are employed or volunteer for athletic purposes.
(ii) As used in this section, “recruiting” means the
use of undue influence or special inducement by an individual who is
connected directly or indirectly with a school that is a member of the
Arkansas Activities Association in an attempt to encourage, induce, pressure,
urge, or entice a prospective student of any age to transfer to the school or
retain a student at the school for the purpose of participating in
extracurricular activities.
(3) As used in subdivision (f)(1) of this section,
“extracurricular activity” means an interschool activity not included in a
regular curriculum, including without limitation sports and special interest
clubs or groups.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 6-18-1905 is amended to read as follows:
6-18-1905. Application for transfer.
(a)(1) An application under this section shall be accepted no earlier
than January 1 and no later than May 1 each year.
(2)(A) Each school district shall have a policy stating the
method by which a parent or guardian of a student, or a student who is
eighteen (18) years of age or older, may submit a school choice application,
including without limitation:
(i) Regular mail;
(ii) Email; and
(iii) Hand delivery.
(B) A public school district shall not require in-person
filing of an application.
(C) Each school district shall determine for each school
within the school district the capacity of each school and each grade level.
(3) If a student seeks to attend a school in a nonresident
district or another school within his or her resident district, the student's
parent or guardian, or a student who is eighteen (18) years of age or older,
shall submit an application:
(A) To the nonresident district and to the student's
resident district, or only to the resident district if the student is
applying to transfer to another public school within his or her resident
district;
04/03/2025 2:20:43 PM TNL416

SB624
(B) On a form approved by the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education; and
(C) Postmarked or delivered no later than May 1 of the
year in which the student seeks to begin the fall semester at the nonresident
district or other public school within the student's resident district,
except as otherwise provided for dependents of uniformed service members and
uniformed service veterans under this subchapter.
(b) Both the nonresident district and the resident district, or only
the resident district if a student applies to transfer to another public
school within his or her resident district, shall, upon receipt of the
application submitted under subsection (a) of this section, place a date and
time stamp on the application that reflects the date and time each the
nonresident district or resident district if a student applies to transfer to
another public school within his or her resident district received the
application.
(c) A nonresident district or a resident district if a student applies
to transfer to another public school within his or her resident district
shall review and make a determination on each application in the order in
which the application was received by the nonresident district or resident
district.
(d) Before accepting or rejecting an application, a nonresident
district or a resident district if a student applies to transfer to another
public school within his or her resident district shall determine whether the
limitation under § 6-18-1906 applies to the application.
(e)(1) By July 1 of the school year in which a student seeks to enroll
in a nonresident district or a resident district if a student seeks to enroll
in another public school within his or her resident district under this
subchapter, the superintendent of the nonresident district or the
superintendent of the resident district if the student applies to transfer to
another public school within his or her resident district shall notify the
student's parent or guardian and the resident district, if applicable, in
writing as to whether the student's application has been accepted or
rejected.
(2) If an application is rejected, the superintendent of the
nonresident district or the superintendent of the resident district if the
student applies to transfer to another public school within his or her
04/03/2025 2:20:43 PM TNL416

SB624
resident district shall state in the notification letter the reason for
rejection.
(3) If an application is accepted, the superintendent of the
nonresident district or the superintendent of the resident district if the
student applies to transfer to another public school within his or her
resident district shall state in the notification letter a reasonable
deadline by which the student shall enroll in the nonresident district or the
resident district if the student applies to transfer to another public school
within his or her resident district and after which the acceptance
notification is null.
(f)(1) For each application received under this section, the a
nonresident district or a resident district if a student applies to transfer
to another public school within his or her resident district shall notify the
applicant in writing as to whether the student's application has been
accepted or rejected within fifteen (15) calendar days of the nonresident
district's or resident district's receipt of the application.
(2) A transfer of the student is effective immediately upon the
nonresident district's or resident district's written notification of an
acceptance.
(g)(1) Each school district shall report annually to the Secretary of
the Department of Education the number of transfer applications, acceptances,
denials, and reasons for each denial under this subchapter.
(2) The data received by the secretary under subdivision (g)(1)
of this section shall be published annually on the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education website.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 6-18-1907(b), concerning rules promulgated
under the Public School Choice Act of 2015, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) A student whose application for a transfer under § 6-18-1905 is
rejected by the a nonresident district or a resident district if a student
applies to transfer to another public school within his or her resident
district may request a hearing before the state board to reconsider the
transfer.
(2)(A) A request for a hearing before the state board under
subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be in writing and shall be
postmarked no later than ten (10) days after the student or the student's
04/03/2025 2:20:43 PM TNL416

SB624
parent or legal guardian, as applicable, receives a notice of rejection of
the application under § 6-18-1905.
(B) As part of the review process, the a student or a
parent or legal guardian of the student may submit supporting documentation
that the transfer would be in the best educational, social, or psychological
interest of the student.
(3) If the state board overturns the determination of the
nonresident district or resident district if the student applied to transfer
to another public school within his or her resident district on appeal, the
state board shall notify the parent, the nonresident district, if applicable,
and the resident district of the basis for the state board's decision.
(4) A student is not permitted to request a hearing before the
state board if his or her application for a transfer is rejected due to the
application's not being timely received by both the resident district and
nonresident district, if applicable.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 6-18-1909(b), concerning an application of
a child who is a dependent of certain uniformed service members under the
Public School Choice Act of 2015, is amended to read as follows:
(b) If a student eligible under subsection (a) of this section seeks
to attend a school in a nonresident district or another public school within
his or her resident district, the student's parent, legal guardian, or person
standing in loco parentis to the student shall submit an application approved
by the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education by regular mail,
electronic mail, or in person to the student's nonresident district, if
applicable, and resident district, which includes:
(1) A copy of the identification card of the student's parent,
legal guardian, or person standing in loco parentis that qualifies the
student under this section; and
(2) A copy of the official orders, assignment notification, or
notice of mobilization of the student's parent, legal guardian, or person
standing in loco parentis.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 6-18-1909(e), concerning the
transportation of a child who is a dependent of certain uniformed service
members and who transfers under the Public School Choice Act of 2015, is
04/03/2025 2:20:43 PM TNL416

SB624
amended to read as follows:
(e) The parent, legal guardian, or person standing in loco parentis to
a student eligible for a school transfer under this section shall be
responsible for the transportation of his or her child to and from a
nonresident district if the student transfers to a nonresident district under
this subchapter.






























04/03/2025 2:20:43 PM TNL416